Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.070

Registration of certificates.

(1) All certificates issued by the superintendent of public instruction shall be valid and entitle the holder thereof to employment in any school district of the state upon being registered by the school district if designated to do so by the school district, which fact shall be evidenced on the certificate in the words, "Registered for use in . . . . . . district," together with the date of registry, and an official signature of the person registering the same: PROVIDED, That a copy of the original certificate duly certified by the superintendent of public instruction may be used for the purpose of registry and endorsement in lieu of the original.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction may accept applications for educator certification that are submitted using an electronic signature from the applicant.

[ 2007 c 401 s 7; 1983 c 56 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 135; 1971 c 48 s 50; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.130. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 338 s 11; RRS s 4976; prior: 1897 c 118 s 147. Formerly RCW 28A.70.130, 28.70.130.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 401: See note following RCW 28A.300.500.

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.